Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 3 Rates, Interchange of Services and Safety

Law reviews. —

For article, “Deregulation of the Energy Industry,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right to cut off water supply because of failure to pay sewer service charge, 26 ALR2d 1359.

Deposit required by public utility, 43 ALR2d 1262.

Liability of electric power or light company to patron for interruption, failure, or inadequacy of power, 4 ALR3d 594.

Liability of premises, or their owner or occupant, for electricity, gas, or water charges, irrespective of who is the user, 19 ALR3d 1227.

Right of municipality to refuse services provided by it to resident for failure of resident to pay for other unrelated services, 60 ALR3d 714.

Liability of telephone company to subscriber for failure or interruption of service, 67 ALR3d 76.

Right of public utility to deny service at one address because of failure to pay for past service rendered at another, 73 ALR3d 1292.

Amount paid by public utility to affiliate for goods or services as includible in utility's rate base and operating expenses in rate proceeding, 16 ALR4th 454.

Propriety of considering capital structure of utility's parent company or subsidiary in setting utility's rate of return, 80 ALR4th 280.

Public utility's right to recover cost of nuclear power plants abandoned before completion, 83 ALR4th 183.